Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB109.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 403.044 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In divorce actions in which there are minor children who are the issue of the
marriage, no testimony[ other than on temporary motions] shall be taken or heard
before sixty (60) days have elapsed from the date of service of summons, the
appointment of a warning order attorney, or the filing of an entry of appearance or a
responsive pleading by the defendant, whichever occurs first.
(2) The prohibition under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Temporary motions; or
(b) Parties who have successfully completed:
1. The collaborative law process as provided in KRS 403.640 to 403.670
and have filed with the court a:
a. Notice of collaborative law process;
b. Property and custody agreement; and
c. Proposed decree of dissolution of marriage that includes
reference to the completion of the collaborative law process that
resulted in a property and custody agreement; or
2. Family mediation and have filed with the court a:
a. Notice of completion of family mediation;
b. Property and custody agreement; and
c. Proposed decree of dissolution of marriage that includes
reference to the completion of family mediation that resulted in a
property and custody agreement.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/23/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed